Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3.1. Lead Acid Batteries.

§ 10.1-1425.1.
Lead acid batteries; land disposal prohibited; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place a used lead acid battery in mixed municipal solid waste or to discard or otherwise dispose of a lead acid battery except by delivery to a battery retailer or wholesaler, or to a secondary lead smelter, or to a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth or by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. As used in this article, the term “lead acid battery” shall mean any wet cell battery.

It shall be unlawful for any battery retailer to dispose of a used lead acid battery except by delivery to (i) the agent of a battery wholesaler or a secondary lead smelter, (ii) a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter, or (iii) a collection or recycling facility authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth or by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Any person found guilty of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars. Each battery improperly disposed of shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

1990, c. 520.

§ 10.1-1425.2.
Collection of lead acid batteries for recycling.

Any person selling lead acid batteries at retail or offering lead acid batteries for retail sale in the Commonwealth shall:

Accept from customers, at the point of transfer, used lead acid batteries of the type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers; and

Post written notice which shall be at least 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches in size and which shall include the universal recycling symbol and the following language: (i) “It is illegal to discard a motor vehicle battery or other lead acid battery,” (ii) “Recycle your used batteries,” and (iii) “State law requires us to accept used motor vehicle batteries or other lead acid batteries for recycling, in exchange for new batteries purchased.”

History.

1990, c. 520.

§ 10.1-1425.3.
Inspection of battery retailers; penalty.

The Department shall produce, print, and distribute the notices required by §

10.1-1425.2

to all places in the Commonwealth where lead acid batteries are offered for sale at retail.
In performing its duties under this section, the Department may inspect any place, building, or premises subject to the provisions of §

10.1-1425.2

.
Authorized employees of the Department may issue warnings to persons who fail to comply with the provisions of this article.
Any person found guilty of failing to post the notice required under §

10.1-1425.2

after receiving a warning to do so pursuant to this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars.

History.

1990, c. 520.

§ 10.1-1425.4.
Lead acid battery wholesalers; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person selling new lead acid batteries at wholesale to not accept from customers at the point of transfer, used lead acid batteries of the type and in a quantity at least equal to the number of new batteries purchased, if offered by customers. A person accepting batteries in transfer from a battery retailer shall be allowed a period not to exceed ninety days to remove batteries from the retail point of collection.

Any person found guilty of a violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars. Each battery unlawfully refused by a wholesaler or not removed from the retail point of collection within ninety days shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

1990, c. 520.

§ 10.1-1425.5.
Construction of article.

The provisions of this article shall not be construed to prohibit any person who does not sell new lead acid batteries from collecting and recycling such batteries.

History.

1990, c. 520.